Utah statutes.
78B-9-403.   Requests for appointment of counsel -- Appeals -- Postconviction petitions.

(1)  Subsections 78B-9-109(1) and (2), regarding the appointment of pro bono counsel, apply to any request for the appointment of counsel under this part.

(2)  Subsection 78B-9-109(3), regarding effectiveness of counsel, applies to subsequent postconviction petitions and to appeals under this part.



Enacted by Chapter 358, 2008 General Session

